District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.16

Operating under the influence of alcohol or a drug; horse-drawn vehicle.

(a)

No person shall operate or be in the physical control of any horse-drawn vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or any drug or any combination thereof.

(b)

A person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or be incarcerated for not more than 90 days, or both.

(c)

Civil penalties and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any violation of this section in accordance with the procedures under Chapter 14 of Title 8 [§ 8-1401 et seq.].

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3g
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 272, 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 50-2206.54 and § 50-2206.55.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “$500” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 272 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.